Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW to read as follows:(1) In addition to the tax imposed upon the sale, use, consumption, handling, possession, or distribution of cigarettes set forth in RCW 82.24.020 and 82.24.026, there is imposed an embodied carbon tax in an amount equal to $0.0015 per cigarette, adjusted as provided in subsection (2) of this section.(2) Beginning October 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the rate established in subsection (1) of this section must be increased by 25 percent plus the rate of inflation as measured by the most recently available 12 months of the consumer price index for all urban consumers. The adjusted rate must be rounded to the nearest full cent and published on the department's website.(3) The revenue collected under this section must be deposited into the general fund.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act takes effect October 1, 2025.--- END ---